New Jersey, session 221, A3169.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  New Jerseys high property taxes continue to make it difficult for homeowners and renters to live in the State, as high property taxes increase the cost of homeownership and the cost of monthly rent. b.  Changes in the housing market, including high mortgage interest rates and a lack of affordable housing, have a deleterious impact on homeowners and renters, including disabled veteran homeowners and renters, many of whom can no longer afford to buy a home or find an affordable rental unit in New Jersey. c.  In this State, approximately 73 percent of veterans identify as having a disability, and this population is recognized as experiencing higher rates of unemployment and homelessness in comparison to the general population. d.  New Jerseys high property taxes and rental costs exacerbate the financial burdens of disabled veterans, further hindering their ability to live in New Jersey. e.  Approximately 518 veterans are homeless in this State, accounting for about 5 percent of the unhoused adult population. f.  It is in the best interest of the State to provide a rebate for disabled veterans residing in this State in an effort to prevent disabled veteran homelessness. 2.    (New section) As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Arm's-length transaction" means a transaction in which the parties are dealing from equal bargaining positions, neither party is subject to the other's control or dominant influence, and the transaction is entirely legal in all respects and is treated with fairness and integrity; "Condominium" means the form of real property ownership provided for under the "Condominium Act," P.L.1969, c.257 (C.46:8B-1 et seq.); "Continuing care retirement community" means a residential facility primarily for retired persons where lodging and nursing, medical, or other health-related services at the same or another location are provided as continuing care to an individual pursuant to an agreement effective for the life of the individual or for a period greater than one year, including mutually terminable contracts, and in consideration of the payment of an entrance fee with or without other periodic charges; "Cooperative" means a housing corporation or association that entitles the holder of a share or membership interest thereof to possess and occupy for dwelling purposes a house, apartment, manufactured or mobile home, or other unit of housing owned or leased by the corporation or association, or to lease or purchase a unit of housing constructed or to be constructed by the corporation or association; "Director" means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury; "Dwelling house" means any residential property assessed as real property which consists of not more than four units, of which not more than one may be used for commercial purposes, but shall not include a unit in a condominium, cooperative, horizontal property regime, or mutual housing corporation; "Homestead" means: a. (1) a dwelling house and the land on which that dwelling house is located, which dwelling house constitutes the place of the claimant's domicile and is owned and used by the claimant as the claimant's principal residence; (2)   a dwelling house situated on land owned by a person other than the claimant, which dwelling house constitutes the place of the claimant's domicile and is owned and used by the claimant as the claimant's principal residence; (3)   a condominium unit or a unit in a horizontal property regime, which unit constitutes the place of the claimant's domicile and is owned and used by the claimant as the claimant's principal residence; (4)   for purposes of this definition as provided in this subsection, in addition to the generally accepted meaning of owned or ownership, a homestead shall be deemed to be owned by a person if that person is a tenant for life or a tenant under a lease for 99 years or more and is entitled to and actually takes possession of the homestead under an executory contract for the sale thereof or under an agreement with a lending institution which holds title as security for a loan, or is a resident of a continuing care retirement community pursuant to a contract for continuing care for the life of that person, which contract requires the resident to bear a share of the property taxes that are assessed upon the continuing care retirement community, if a share is attributable to the unit that the resident occupies; b.    a unit in a cooperative or mutual housing corporation which constitutes the place of domicile of a residential shareholder or lessee therein, or of a lessee, or shareholder who is not a residential shareholder therein, and which is used by the claimant as the claimant's principal residence; and c.     a unit of residential rental property, which unit constitutes the place of the claimant's domicile and is used by the claimant as the claimant's principal residence; "Horizontal property regime" means the form of real property ownership provided for under the "Horizontal Property Act," P.L.1963, c.168 (C.46:8A-1 et seq.); "Income" means all New Jersey gross income required to be reported pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., before the application of any authorized exclusion or deduction, except also including: interest income excluded from taxation pursuant to N.J.S.54A:6-14; pension and annuity income excluded from taxation pursuant to N.J.S.54A:6-10; income derived from distributions from or roll overs to a Roth IRA excluded from taxation pursuant to N.J.S.54A:6-28; other retirement income excluded from taxation pursuant to N.J.S.54A:6-15; and Social Security income excluded from taxation pursuant to N.J.S.54A:6-2, as self-reported by the homeowner; "Manufactured home" or "mobile home" means a unit of housing that: (1)   Consists of one or more transportable sections that are substantially constructed off site and, if more than one section, are joined together on site; (2)   Is built on a permanent chassis; (3)   Is designed to be used, when connected to utilities, as a dwelling on a permanent or nonpermanent foundation; and (4)   Is manufactured in accordance with the standards promulgated for a manufactured home by the Secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to the "National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974," Pub.L.93-383 (42 U.S.C. s.5401 et seq.) and the standards promulgated for a manufactured or mobile home by the commissioner pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.); "Mobile home park" means a parcel of land, or two or more parcels of land, containing no fewer than 10 sites equipped for the installation of manufactured or mobile homes, where these sites are under common ownership and control for the purpose of leasing each site to the owner of a manufactured or mobile home for the installation thereof, and where the owner or owners provide services that are provided by the municipality in which the park is located for property owners outside the park, which services may include but shall not be limited to: (1)   The construction and maintenance of streets; (2)   Lighting of streets and other common areas; (3)   Garbage removal; (4)   Snow removal; and (5)   Provisions for the drainage of surface water from home sites and common areas; "Mutual housing corporation" means a corporation not-for-profit, incorporated under the laws of this State on a mutual or cooperative basis within the scope of section 607 of the Lanham Act (National Defense Housing), Pub.L.849, 76th Congress (42 U.S.C. s.1521 et seq.), as amended, which acquired a National Defense Housing Project pursuant to that act; "Principal residence" means a homestead actually and continually occupied by a claimant as the claimant's permanent residence, as distinguished from a vacation home, property owned and rented or offered for rent by the claimant, and other secondary real property holdings; "Property tax" means payments to a municipality based upon an assessment made by the municipality upon real property on an ad valorem basis on land and improvements, and shall include the amount of property tax credit as defined in section 1 of P.L.2018, c.11 (C.54:4-66.6), but shall not include payments made in lieu of taxes; "Rent" means the amount due in an arm's-length transaction solely for the right of occupancy of a homestead that is a unit of residential rental property.  Rent shall not include any amount paid under the federal Housing Choice Voucher (Section 8) Program or paid as a rental assistance grant under section 1 of P.L.2004, c.140 (C.52:27D-287.1).  If the director finds that the parties in a rental transaction have not dealt with each other in an arm's-length transaction and that the rent due was excessive, the director may, for purposes of the homestead rebate claim, adjust the rent claimed in the homestead rebate application to a reasonable amount of rent; "Resident" means an individual: a.     who is domiciled in this State, unless the individual maintains no permanent place of abode in this State, maintains a permanent place of abode elsewhere, and spends in the aggregate no more than 30 days of the tax year in this State; or b.    who is not domiciled in this State but maintains a permanent place of abode in this State and spends in the aggregate more than 183 days of the tax year in this State, unless the individual is in the Armed Forces of the United States; "Residential rental property" means: a.     any building or structure or complex of buildings or structures in which dwelling units are rented or leased or offered for rental or lease for residential purposes; b.    a rooming house, hotel, or motel, if the rooms constituting the homestead are equipped with kitchen and bathroom facilities; c.     any building or structure or complex of buildings or structures constructed under the following sections of the National Housing Act (Pub.L.73-479) as amended and supplemented: section 202, Housing Act of 1959 (Pub.L.86-372) and as subsequently amended, section 231, Housing Act of 1959; and d.    a site in a mobile home park equipped for the installation of manufactured or mobile homes, where these sites are under common ownership and control for the purpose of leasing each site to the owner of a manufactured or mobile home for the installation thereof; Residential shareholder in a cooperative or mutual housing corporation means a tenant or holder of a membership interest in that cooperative or corporation, whose residential unit therein constitutes the tenant or holders domicile and principal residence, and who may deduct real property taxes for purposes of federal income tax pursuant to section 216 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 26 U.S.C. s.216; and "Tax year" means the calendar year in which property taxes are due and payable. 3.    (New section) a.  Except as provided in subsection d. of this section, a resident of this State who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has been declared by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to have a service-connected disability, shall be allowed a rebate for the tax year. The rebate amount shall be a percentage of the property taxes paid by the claimant in that tax year on the claimants homestead equal to the claimants percentage of service-connected disability. The State Treasurer shall annually on or before October 31 pay and distribute the amount of a rebate payable to each claimant whose rebate is approved by the director. b.    In the case of a claimant living in a rental property which constitutes the claimants homestead, 18 percent of the rent paid by the claimant during the tax year shall be considered property taxes paid on the claimants homestead. In the case of a claimant living in a mobile home that constitutes the claimants homestead, 18 percent of the site fee paid by the claimant during the tax year to the owner of the mobile home park shall be considered property taxes paid on the claimants homestead. c.     A rebate allowed pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not exceed $5,000. A claimant with gross income for the tax year in excess of $200,000 shall not be eligible for the rebate. A rebate allowed pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not exceed the property taxes paid by the claimant on the claimants homestead. d.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, if a claimant who is 65 or more years of age, qualifies for a rebate pursuant to P.L.    , c. (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and also qualifies as an eligible claimant pursuant to the Stay NJ Act P.L.2023, c.75, as amended by P.L.2024, c.88 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.), and the combined amount of property tax benefits determined by the director in accordance with P.L.2023, c.75, as amended by P.L.2024, c.88 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.) is: (1) greater than the amount of the rebate determined pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), then the rebate shall not be allowed; or (2) equal to or less then than the rebate determined pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) then the rebate shall be allowed, provided that the sum total of the rebate determined pursuant to this act and the Stay NJ property tax credit shall not exceed 50 percent of the property taxes billed to the individual, up to the maximum amount permitted under section 3 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75c). e.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, if a claimant is not 65 or more years of age, or is 65 or more years of age and whose homestead is a unit of residential rental property, and qualifies for a property tax credit or rebate pursuant to the ANCHOR Homestead Property Tax Credit Act sections 1 through 10 of P.L.1990, c.61 (C.54:4-8.57 through 54:4-8.66) and sections 3, 14 through 16 and 18 and 19 of P.L.1999, c.63 (C.54:4-8.58a and C.54:4-8.66a through 54:4-8.66e), the homestead property tax reimbursement pursuant to P.L.1997, c.348 (C.54:4-8.67 et seq.), or both, and qualifies for a rebate pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), then the individual shall be entitled to the greater of: (1) the combined amount of the ANCHOR property tax credit or rebate and the homestead property tax reimbursement; or (2) the amount of the rebate determined pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). f.  The amount of property taxes used to determine the amount of the rebate shall not be reduced by the amount of the deduction taken by the claimant pursuant to P.L.1963, c.171 (C.54:4-8.10 to C.54:4-8.23) and P.L.1964, c.255 (C.54:4-8.40 to C.54:4-8.45 et al.). 4.    (New section) a.  No rebate shall be allowed pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) except upon annual application, as shall be prescribed by the director.  The director may require a claimant for a rebate to attach to the rebate application a copy of the appropriate property tax bill or proof of rent paid for the prior tax year. b.    Upon approval of rebate applications by the director, the director shall prepare lists of individuals entitled to a rebate, together with the respective amounts due each claimant, and shall forward those lists to the State Treasurer, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, and any other officials as the director deems appropriate, on or before the earliest of such date or dates as may be convenient for the director to compile such lists.  The director may inspect all records in the offices of the tax collector and tax assessor of a municipality with respect to applications, claims, and allowances for rebates. c.     If a rebate application contains a claim for a rebate that is incorrectly determined by the claimant or is based upon incorrect or insufficient information from which the director is to approve the claim, the director may determine the eligibility of the claimant for a rebate and the correct amount of a rebate to be paid to that claimant from such other information as may be available to the director.  In addition, the director may adjust the amount of any rebate to which a claimant may be entitled by any part of the amount of any previous rebate erroneously claimed by and paid to that claimant. d.    In the case of a claimant for a rebate whose homestead is a unit in a cooperative, mutual housing corporation, or continuing care retirement community, the director may provide that the application shall include the name and address of the location of the property and the amount of real property taxes attributed to the cooperative, mutual housing residential unit, or continuing care retirement community residential unit, as shall be indicated in an official notice, which shall be furnished by the cooperative, mutual housing corporation, or continuing care retirement community for the same year. e.     A rebate shall be allowed pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) for a claimant whose ownership of an interest in a homestead is satisfied by the holding of the beneficial interest if legal title thereto or share therein is held by another for the benefit of the claimant. 5.    (New section) a.  The director shall determine the amount of the rebate that shall be provided for each claimant pursuant to P.L.   , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) based upon the information provided by the individual applicant in the application or from any other information as may be available to the director, and shall notify the applicant of the determined amount in the form of the rebate check or in any other manner as the director may deem appropriate.  Subject to the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq., such notification shall finally and irrevocably fix the amount of the rebate unless the applicant, within 90 days after having been given notice of such determination, applies to the director for a hearing, or unless the director re-determines the same.  After such hearing the director shall give notice of the final determination to the applicant. b.  An applicant for a rebate authorized under P.L.   , c.   (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) who is aggrieved by any decision, order, finding, or denial by the director of all or part of that applicant's rebate may appeal therefrom to the New Jersey Tax Court in accordance with the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S. 54:48-1 et seq. The appeal shall be the exclusive remedy available to an applicant for review of a decision of the director in respect to the determination of all or part of a rebate authorized under P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.     A rebate paid as a result of misrepresentation or paid in error, shall be payable to and recoverable by the director in the same manner as a deficiency with respect to the payment of a State tax in accordance with the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq. 6.  Section 4 of P.L.2023. c.75 (C.54:4-8.75d) is amended to read as follows: 4. a. Not later than February 1, 2025, the director shall promulgate a combined single application form consistent with the requirements of section 6 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75f) and the recommendations of the Stay NJ Task Force established pursuant to section 18 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75o) that shall be available on and after that date to be used by State residents to apply for the Stay NJ property tax credit, the ANCHOR property tax rebate, [and] the homestead property tax reimbursement program, and the disabled veterans property tax rebate.  Applications shall be accepted by the Director of the Division of Taxation from February 1 through October 31 of each year.  State residents seeking property tax benefits under those programs shall complete the entire application and file it with the director.  The director shall determine the amount of the Stay NJ property tax credit, ANCHOR rebate, and homestead property tax reimbursement, as applicable, provided to each applicant pursuant to the requirements of subsection b. of this section. b.    The director shall calculate the amount of each property tax benefit provided to an eligible claimant for each tax year in the following manner: (1) if the eligible claimant qualifies for an ANCHOR rebate, the director shall first determine the amount of the eligible claimant's ANCHOR rebate for the tax year, the full amount of which shall be paid to the eligible claimant; (2) if the eligible claimant qualifies for a homestead property tax reimbursement, the director shall next determine the amount of the eligible claimant's homestead property tax reimbursement for the tax year, the full amount of which shall be paid to the eligible claimant; (3) if the eligible claimant qualifies for a disabled veterans property tax rebate, the director shall next determine the amount of the eligible claimants disabled veterans property tax rebate for the tax year, the full amount of which shall be paid to the eligible claimant; [(3)] (4) if the eligible claimant qualifies for a Stay NJ property tax credit, the director shall then determine the amount of the eligible claimant's Stay NJ property tax credit for the tax year, of which the eligible claimant shall be paid an amount equal to 50 percent of the property taxes billed to the eligible claimant, up to the maximum amount permitted under section 3 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75c), less the amounts paid to the eligible claimant pursuant to paragraphs [(1) and (2)] (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection. c.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.88) d. (1) The director shall determine the amount of the Stay NJ property tax credit that shall be provided for each eligible claimant pursuant to P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.) based upon the information provided by the eligible claimant in the application or from any other information as may be available to the director and shall notify the applicant of the determined amount, in writing and at such time as the director may deem appropriate, together with a detailed calculation of the amount that the eligible claimant is entitled to receive pursuant to subsection b. of this section. (2) The format of the written information to be provided by the director shall be determined by the director and shall, at a minimum, display:  (a) the amount of the eligible claimant's property tax bill for the tax year; (b) the amount of the ANCHOR rebate, homestead property tax reimbursement, [and] Stay NJ property tax credit, and disabled veterans property tax rebate, as applicable, that the eligible claimant is entitled to receive; and (c) the actual property taxes that the eligible claimant shall pay in the tax year after any property tax credits are applied against the eligible claimant's property tax bill. (3) Subject to the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq., such notification shall finally and irrevocably fix the amount of the Stay NJ property tax credit unless the applicant, within 90 days after having been given notice of such determination, shall apply to the director for a hearing or unless the director shall redetermine the same.  After such hearing, the director shall give notice of the final determination to the applicant. e.     An eligible claimant for a Stay NJ property tax credit authorized under P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.) who is aggrieved by any decision, order, finding, or denial by the director of all or part of that eligible claimant's Stay NJ property tax credit may appeal therefrom to the New Jersey Tax Court in accordance with the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq.  The appeal provided by this section shall be the exclusive remedy available to an applicant for review of a decision of a director in respect to the determination of all or a part of a Stay NJ property tax credit authorized under P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.). (cf: P.L.2024, c.88, s.3) 7.  Section 6 of P.L.2023. c.75 (C.54:4-8.75f) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 of P.L.1990, c.61 (C.54:4-8.62) and section 3 of P.L.1997, c.348 (C.54:4-8.70) concerning the form and deadline of applications for the ANCHOR rebate program [and], the homestead property tax reimbursement, and the disabled veterans property tax rebate, the director shall promulgate, not later than February 1, [2025] 2026, a single combined application form to be used by State residents to apply for the ANCHOR rebate program, the homestead property tax reimbursement program, [and] the Stay NJ property tax credit, and the disabled veterans property tax rebate in accordance with the recommendations of the Stay NJ Task Force established pursuant to section 18 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75o). (2) To the extent practicable, the single combined application shall resemble the form and manner of the application for the homestead property tax reimbursement program, as created pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1997, c.348 (C.54:4-8.70), except that the single combined application form shall, at a minimum, require the applicant to submit information about his or her age, annual income, including the amount of Social Security payments received by the applicant, homestead property address, as well as any other information determined necessary by the director in order to approve or disapprove the applicant's participation in those programs. (3) The combined application form shall also advise the applicant that the director shall determine the eligibility of an applicant to receive an ANCHOR rebate, a homestead property tax reimbursement, [or] a Stay NJ property tax credit, or a disabled veterans property tax rebate, or any combination thereof.  The director shall, for good cause shown, extend the time of any applicant to file an application for a reasonable period, and in such case, the application shall be processed and payment of an ANCHOR rebate, homestead property tax reimbursement, [or] a Stay NJ property tax credit, or a disabled veterans property tax rebate, or any combination thereof, made in accordance with the procedures established in the case of applications timely filed, except the date for the payment may be delayed for a reasonable period.  If an applicant or an applicant's spouse has filed an application for an extension of time to file a gross income tax return, the date by which the applicant shall file an application may, in the discretion of the director, be extended for a reasonable period, and the date for the payment of an ANCHOR rebate, homestead property tax reimbursement, [or] a Stay NJ property tax credit, or a disabled veterans property tax rebate, or any combination thereof, may be delayed for a reasonable period.  A State resident seeking property tax benefits under any of those programs shall accurately complete the entire application and file it with the director. (4) For purposes of this subsection, in order to establish good cause to extend the time of an eligible claimant to file an application, the eligible claimant shall provide to the director either medical evidence, such as a doctor's certification, that the claimant was unable to file the claim by the date prescribed by the director because of illness or hospitalization, or evidence that the applicant attempted to file a timely application.  Except as may be established by medical evidence or inability to file a claim, good cause shall not be established due to a claimant not having received an application from the director. b.    Upon the approval of applications by the director, the director shall prepare lists of individuals entitled to receive a Stay NJ property tax credit, together with the respective amounts due each eligible claimant and shall forward such lists to the State Treasurer, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, and any other officials as the director deems appropriate on or before the earliest of such date or dates as may be convenient for the director to compile such lists.  The director may inspect all records in the office of the tax collector and tax assessor of a municipality with respect to applications, claims, and allowances for Stay NJ property tax credits. c.     If an application contains a claim for a Stay NJ property tax credit that contains incorrect information from the claimant or is based upon incorrect or insufficient information from which the director is to determine and approve the claim, the director may determine the eligibility of the claimant for a Stay NJ property tax credit and the correct amount of a Stay NJ property tax credit from such other information as may be available to the director. d.    In the case of an eligible claimant whose homestead is a unit in a cooperative, mutual housing corporation, or continuing care retirement community, the director may provide that the application shall include the name and address of the location of the property and the amount of real property taxes attributed to the cooperative, mutual housing residential unit, or continuing care retirement community residential unit, as shall be indicated in an official notice which shall be furnished by the cooperative, mutual housing corporation, or continuing care retirement community for the tax year. (cf:  P.L.2024, c.88, s.5) 8.    a.  The tax collector of each municipality shall, on or before April 1 of each year, furnish the director with a list of property taxpayers in the district who are delinquent for taxes due and payable for the year immediately preceding and the amounts of such delinquencies.  The collector shall report on such list the name, lot and block number on the property tax duplicate as may be applicable, and the address of each owner to whom a delinquency is attributable together with the amount of such delinquency so identified.  No rebate payment under P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be made to a property owner while that property owner's delinquency remains; provided, however, that for the purposes of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), for an assessment on a property which is on appeal and for which the statutory percentage of the tax as provided in R.S.54:3-27 has been paid, the taxes assessed on that property shall not be regarded as delinquent. b.    If the director receives the list as provided for in subsection a. of this section, and the director determines that a property tax delinquency remains for the preceding tax year on April 1, the director shall ascertain the amount of the rebate required to be withheld because of such delinquency in each municipality in the State, and shall certify such amounts to the State Treasurer as soon thereafter as may be practicable. c.     On or before November 15, the director shall notify each rebate claimant whose rebate has been withheld because of delinquency that the amount of the rebate to which the claimant otherwise would have been entitled has been sent to the tax collector in the municipality to be credited against the claimant's delinquency. d.    Upon certification by the director as to the amount of rebates required to be withheld because of delinquency in the several municipalities, the State Treasurer, upon the warrant of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall pay such amount on or before October 30 to the tax collector in each municipality. e.     The tax collector in each municipality shall credit the tax delinquency of each property taxpayer who appears on the delinquency list set forth in subsection a. of this section in the amount that otherwise would have been returned to the property taxpayer as a rebate.  In the event that the amount so credited by the tax collector exceeds the amount of delinquency, the tax collector may return the difference to the taxpayer or credit such amount to the subsequent property tax bill. f.     In the case of delinquency in the payment of property taxes by a cooperative, mutual housing corporation, or continuing care retirement community, a rebate that may be due an individual resident shall be paid by the State Treasurer to the tax collector of the municipality.  The tax collector shall credit the cooperative, mutual housing corporation, or continuing care retirement community with such payment and the cooperative, mutual housing corporation, or continuing care retirement community shall, in turn, credit the individual unit owner to the extent of the rebate and notify the applicant of the amount to be credited. g.    If a tax collector fails to comply with the provisions of subsection a. of this section requiring the tax collector to furnish the director with a list, on or before April 1 of each year, of property taxpayers in the district delinquent for taxes due and payable for the year immediately preceding and the amounts of such delinquencies, the director shall pay the rebate directly to the delinquent applicant rather than to the tax collector of the municipality as set forth in subsection d. of this section. 9.  The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) and to prescribe forms to administer the provisions of this act.  Notwithstanding any provisions of P.L.1968, c.410 to the contrary, the director may adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, such regulations as the director deems necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 18 months from the date of the filing. Such regulations may thereafter be amended, adopted or readopted by the director as the director deems necessary in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410. 10.  Nothing in this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be interpreted to deny a disabled veteran from receiving any credit, rebate, or deduction guaranteed by the New Jersey Constitution. 11.  This act shall take effect immediately.